Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 33 Unsolicited Goods

6-33-1.
Unsolicited goods.

If unsolicited goods or merchandise of any kind are either addressed to or intended for the recipient, the goods or merchandise shall, unless otherwise agreed, be deemed a gift to the recipient who may use them or dispose of them in any manner without any obligation to the sender.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 145, § 1.